Georgia statutes. TITLE 45 Public Officers and Employees
PART 4 State Planning and Development

Cross references.

Powers and duties of Department of Community Affairs relating to planning and development of local units of government, etc., §

50-8-1

et seq.

45-12-170.
[Reserved] Office of Planning and Budget to perform planning and development function; powers and duties generally; recommendations of planned communities for state development assistance.

History.

Ga. L. 1974, p. 1215, § 2; repealed by Ga. L. 2015, p. 385, § 2-8/HB 252, effective July 1, 2015.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 385, § 2-8/HB 252 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective July 1, 2015.

45-12-171.
Office to be principal state agency for coordinating development, demographic data, statistical coordination, and federal programs; applications for and receipt of financial assistance.

The Office of Planning and Budget shall be:

The principal state agency for coordinating planning and programming for comprehensive development;

The state agency responsible for preparing, maintaining, and furnishing official demographic data for the state; and

The principal state agency for statistical coordination and standardization.

The office may apply for and receive grants-in-aid, contributions, and any other forms of financial or other assistance from any source, public or private, for the purposes of this Code section and Code Sections 45-12-172 and 45-12-177.

The office shall serve as the state agency for all federal programs which require state designation of a single clearing-house if federal or state law does not provide for another state agency or if the Governor does not designate another state agency by executive order.

History.

Ga. L. 1970, p. 321, § 9; Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 45; Ga. L. 2008, p. 324, § 45/SB 455.

45-12-172.
Office to review and comment on proposed development programs and serve as liaison with levels of government.

The Office of Planning and Budget shall be responsible, directly or in cooperation with other agencies, for planning the following activities:

Reviewing and commenting upon the interrelationship with state planning of all applications for federal financial assistance by units of local government and local public agencies, regional commissions, and state agencies; and, where appropriate, reviewing and commenting to appropriate federal or state agencies that such proposed programs satisfy the requirements of or are not inconsistent with state law or with state and area forecasts and development programs or other state policies; and

Serving in a liaison capacity with federal, state, and local levels of government.

History.

Ga. L. 1970, p. 321, § 10; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1317, § 6.19; Ga. L. 2008, p. 181, § 22/HB 1216.

45-12-173.
Office to promote state development; duties of Governor; employment of personnel; furnishing of advice and assistance by other state officials.

The Office of Planning and Budget shall perform the function of promoting the orderly growth and development of the state through the proper planning and programming of the affairs of state government. The Governor shall be ex officio director of state planning.

The Governor, through the Office of Planning and Budget, shall make available such planning and programming service, technical assistance, information, and advice as specified in this Code section and Code Sections 45-12-174 through 45-12-176 to departments, agencies, and institutions of state government, to the General Assembly, and to local and joint units of government and other public bodies as may be appropriate to achieve the purposes of this Code section and Code Sections 45-12-174 through 45-12-176.

The Governor, through the Office of Planning and Budget, shall encourage comprehensive and coordinated planning and programming of the affairs of the state government. He may inquire into the methods of planning and program development in the conduct of the affairs of state government; he may prescribe for adequate systems of records for planning and programming purposes; and he may prescribe the institution and uses of standards for effective planning and programming.

The Governor shall prepare and submit to the General Assembly a development program for the consideration and review of the General Assembly. A program budget report shall satisfy this requirement. The development program shall be submitted within five days after the organization of the General Assembly for review with the budget document.

The director of the Office of Planning and Budget is authorized and directed to employ fully qualified professional, technical, and clerical personnel as required to carry out the duties prescribed in this Code section and Code Sections 45-12-174 through 45-12-176.

The Attorney General, the state auditor, and such other state officials as shall be called upon shall render such advice and assistance and furnish such information to the Office of Planning and Budget as may be requested and needed.

History.

Ga. L. 1967, p. 252, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 45; Ga. L. 2005, p. 976, § 6/HB 509.

Law reviews.

For note, “Regulation of Artificial Lakes and Recreational Subdivisions in Georgia,” recommending methods for future regulation, see 8 Ga. St. B.J. 580 (1972).

45-12-174.
Development functions of office generally.

The Office of Planning and Budget, at the direction of the Governor and subject to Code Section 45-12-173, this Code section, and Code Sections 45-12-175 and 45-12-176, shall perform the following functions:

Prepare comprehensive, long-range recommendations for the orderly and coordinative growth of the state, including, but not necessarily limited to, recommendations on long-range functional plans in such areas of state concern as transportation, outdoor recreation, water resources, and economic development, and submit such recommendations to the General Assembly;

Analyze the quality and quantity of services required for the continued orderly and long-range growth of the state, taking into consideration the relationship of activities, capabilities, and future plans of local units of government, area commissions, development districts, private enterprise, and the state and federal government;

Work to harmonize the planning activities of all state departments, agencies, and institutions and other public and private bodies within the state;

Provide technical assistance in the development of planning programs by state departments, agencies, and institutions; local levels of government; and other public bodies within the state;

Work with departments, agencies, and institutions of state government to study and review plans and programs filed with the federal government by state departments, agencies, or institutions relative to any existing, new, expanded, or amended federal-aid program;

At the direction of the Governor, survey, review, and appraise the accomplishments of state government in achieving the goals and objectives set forth in the development program; and

Provide assistance to the General Assembly on request and be available to assist its committees with any needed information or material.

History.

Ga. L. 1967, p. 252, § 2; Ga. L. 1976, p. 648, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 45.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1990, semicolons were substituted for commas following “institutions” and “government” in paragraph (4).

45-12-175.
Preparation of long-range development plans by office; designation of planning officer or representative by departments, agencies, or institutions.

The Governor, through the Office of Planning and Budget, shall have in continuous process and revision a strategic plan for the state as a whole. This plan shall be updated at least on an annual basis and shall cover a minimum period of time as determined by the Office of Planning and Budget, but not less than five years. It shall have as its primary goal the improved fiscal responsibility and responsiveness of state government and the effective and efficient delivery of services throughout the geographic area of the state with an emphasis on decentralizing state government. The goals and strategies contained in this state strategic plan shall be reflected by the various departments, boards, bureaus, commissions, institutions, authorities, and other agencies of state government, as respectively applies, in the development of their own strategic plans which specifically deal with their respective future directions and organizational missions. Each strategic plan developed by each department, board, bureau, commission, institution, authority, and other agency of state government shall contain a description of its future direction; a statement of its organizational mission; a description of the current and anticipated future needs being addressed by its preferred future direction and organizational mission; a description of planned actions designed to address these needs; a description of the goals for the program or services to be improved; a course of action for achieving the planned improvements, including an implementation timetable; a description of the evaluation system to be used to determine if the goals are being attained; an estimated annual cost for each planned improvement of a program or service; all efforts to decentralize its administrative and operational functions; and all other items as the Office of Planning and Budget may deem necessary. Each department, board, bureau, commission, institution, authority, and other agency of state government shall submit its own strategic plan to the Office of Planning and Budget as supporting information for the budget estimates required under Code Section 45-12-78.

The Office of Planning and Budget shall cause to be prepared and coordinate the development of strategic plans by departments, boards, bureaus, commissions, institutions, authorities, and other agencies to ensure that the state-wide directions are met. The Office of Planning and Budget shall:

Ensure that the focus of the various plans do not conflict with the general state goals;

Offer assistance to the various departments, boards, bureaus, commissions, institutions, authorities, and other agencies of state government in the design and execution of their programs and be the coordinating agency for the separate department or agency proposals; and

Phase in implementation by the various departments, boards, bureaus, commissions, institutions, authorities, and other agencies of state government.

To assist in the development of plans and programs of state government, the Governor, through the Office of Planning and Budget, may request, as appropriate, that each department, agency, and institution of state government designate, from among its employees and officers, a planning officer or representative who shall be responsible for the planning and coordination of the activities and responsibilities of the department, agency, or institution. Such planning officer or representative shall coordinate program plans prepared for each area of program responsibility within his or her agency of the state government.

History.

Ga. L. 1967, p. 252, § 3; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1914, § 14; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1865, § 6; Ga. L. 2008, p. VO1, § 2-4/HB 529.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1914, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Budget Accountability and Planning Act of 1993.’ ”

Ga. L. 2008, p. VO1, which amended this Code section, was passed by the General Assembly as HB 529 at the 2007 regular session but vetoed by the Governor on May 30, 2007. The General Assembly overrode that veto on January 28, 2008, and the Act became effective on that date.

45-12-176.
Preparation and maintenance of inventory of federal programs and projects; filing of plans with office.

The Governor, through the Office of Planning and Budget, shall inventory and analyze the availability of all federal programs and projects involving state government and such other federal programs as may be available to local units of government and other public bodies. This inventory shall be maintained on a current basis.

Copies of existing programs and program plans prepared by state government for any federal agency in conjunction with any existing or proposed federal-aid program involving the state shall be filed as requested with the Office of Planning and Budget.

History.

Ga. L. 1967, p. 252, § 4.

45-12-177.
Office to review and establish state goals and policies; Governor to prepare annual policy document reflecting state strategic plan.

The Office of Planning and Budget shall have the power and duty to review and consider immediate and long-range state agency proposals, goals, and directions and to establish state-wide goals and policies.

The Governor, through the Office of Planning and Budget, shall prepare an annual policy document to reflect the state strategic plan and address state-wide goals, objectives, and opportunities. A program budget report shall satisfy this requirement. Such policy document shall be transmitted to the General Assembly at the beginning of each legislative session beginning with the 2006 session.

History.

Ga. L. 1970, p. 321, § 4; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1914, § 15; Ga. L. 2005, p. 976, § 7/HB 509.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1914, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Budget Accountability and Planning Act of 1993.’ ”

45-12-178.
[Repealed] Ongoing review by Governor of all programs and functions in state government.

History.

Ga. L. 1970, p. 321, § 6; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1914, §§ 16, 17; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1865, § 7; Ga. L. 1995, p. 10, § 45; Ga. L. 1995, p. 923, § 2; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1535, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1998, p. 128, § 45; repealed by Ga. L. 2008, p. VO1, § 2-5, effective January 28, 2008.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2008, p. VO1, which repealed this Code section, was passed by the General Assembly as HB 529 at the 2007 regular session but vetoed by the Governor on May 30, 2007. The General Assembly overrode that veto on January 28, 2008, and the Act became effective on that date.